Hawaii statutes.
§353-69 Parole when. [Repeal and
reenactment on July 1, 2018. L 2013, c 67, §2.] Except as provided in
section 706-670, no parole shall be granted unless it appears to the Hawaii
paroling authority that there is a reasonable probability that the prisoner
concerned will live and remain at liberty without violating the law and that
the prisoner's release is not incompatible with the welfare and safety of
society. [L 1917, c 103, §4; RL 1925, §1563; am L 1931, c 126, §5; RL 1935,
§6457; RL 1945, §3962; RL 1955, §83-67; HRS §353-69; am L 1976, c 92, pt of §8;
gen ch 1985; am L 2012, c 139, §§11, 14(4)]

Case Notes

No due process liberty interest in parole is created under
this section. 795 F. Supp. 1020 (1992).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next